Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0735.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2. As used in this act:
(a) "Adult foster care location authorized to care for a
child" means an adult foster care family home or adult foster care
small group home as those terms are defined in section 3 of the
adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA 218, MCL 400.703,
in which a child is placed in accordance with section 5 of 1973 PA
116, MCL 722.115.
(b) "Attorney" means, if appointed to represent a child under
the provisions referenced in section 10, an attorney serving as the
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


child's legal advocate in the manner defined and described in
section 13a of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA
288, MCL 712A.13a.
(c) "Central registry" means a repository of names of
individuals who are identified as perpetrators related to a central
registry case in the department's statewide electronic case
management system.
(d) "Central registry case" means the department confirmed
that a person responsible for the child's health or welfare
committed serious abuse or neglect, sexual abuse, or sexual
exploitation of a child, or allowed a child to be exposed to or
have contact with methamphetamine production.
(e) "Centralized intake" means the department's statewide
centralized processing center for reports of suspected child abuse
and child neglect.
(f) "Child" means an individual under who is less than 18
years of age.
(g) "Child abuse" means harm or threatened harm to a child's
health or welfare that occurs through nonaccidental physical or
mental injury, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or maltreatment,
by a parent, a legal guardian, any other person responsible for the
child's health or welfare, a teacher, a teacher's aide, a member of
the clergy, or an individual 18 years of age or older who is
involved with a youth program.
(h) "Child care organization" means that term as defined in
section 1 of 1973 PA 116, MCL 722.111.
(i) "Child care provider" means an owner, operator, employee,
or volunteer of a child care organization or of an adult foster
care location authorized to care for a child.
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


(j) "Child care regulatory agency" means the department of
licensing and regulatory affairs, the department's division of
child welfare licensing, the department of lifelong education,
advancement, and potential, or a successor state department that is
responsible for the licensing or registration of child care
organizations or the licensing of adult foster care locations
authorized to care for a child.
(k) "Child neglect" means harm or threatened harm to a child's
health or welfare by a parent, legal guardian, or any other person
responsible for the child's health or welfare that occurs through
either of the following:
(i) Negligent treatment, including the failure to provide
adequate food, clothing, shelter, or medical care, though
financially able to do so, or by the failure to seek financial or
other reasonable means to provide adequate food, clothing, shelter,
or medical care.
(ii) Placing a child at an unreasonable serious risk to the
child's health or welfare by failure of the parent, legal guardian,
or other person responsible for the child's health or welfare to
intervene to prevent, to take sufficient precautions to adequately
reduce, or to eliminate that risk when that person is able to do so
and has, or should have, knowledge of the serious risk. Child
neglect does not include any of the following:
(A) Where a child is left unsupervised and there is no person
able and willing to supervise the child unless the absence of
supervision placed the child at a reasonably foreseeable risk of
serious harm.
(B) Where a child engages in independent activities outside
the supervision of a parent, legal guardian, or other person
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


responsible for the child's welfare unless the parent, legal
guardian, or person responsible for the child's welfare
unreasonably disregarded the risks of harm from those activities
given the child's maturity, physical condition, and cognitive
ability. As used in this sub-subparagraph, "independent activities"
includes, but is not limited to, traveling to or from school or a
nearby location by bicycle or on foot, playing outdoors, or
remaining at home or other location for a reasonable period of
time.
(l) "Children's advocacy center" means an entity accredited as
a child advocacy center by the National Children's Alliance or its
successor agency or an entity granted associate or developing
membership status by the National Children's Alliance or its
successor agency.
(m) "Citizen review panel" means a panel established as
required by section 5106a of the child abuse prevention and
treatment act, 42 USC 5106a.
(n) "Confirmed case" means the department has determined, by a
preponderance of evidence, that child abuse or child neglect
occurred by a person responsible for the child's health, welfare,
or care.
(o) "Confirmed case of methamphetamine production" means a
confirmed case that involved a child's exposure or contact with
methamphetamine production.
(p) "Confirmed serious abuse or neglect" means a confirmed
case of mental injury or physical injury or neglect to a child that
involves any of the following:
(i) Battering, torture, or other serious physical harm.
(ii) Loss or serious impairment of an organ or limb.
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


(iii) Life-threatening injury.
(iv) Murder or attempted murder.
(v) Serious mental harm.
(q) "Confirmed sexual abuse" means a confirmed case that
involves sexual penetration , or sexual contact , attempted sexual
penetration, or assault with intent to penetrate as those terms are
defined in section 520a of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328,
MCL 750.520a, attempted sexual penetration, or assault with intent
to penetrate.
(r) "Confirmed sexual exploitation" means a confirmed case
that involves allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child to
engage in prostitution, or allowing, permitting, encouraging, or
engaging in the photographing, filming, or depicting of a child
engaged in a listed sexual act as that term is defined in section
145c of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145c.
(s) "Controlled substance" means that term as defined in
section 7104 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7104.
(t) "Department" means the department of health and human
services.
(u) "Director" means the director of the department.
(v) "Electronic case management system" means the child
protective service information system, that is an internal data
system maintained within and by the department.
(w) "Expunge" means to physically remove or eliminate and
destroy a record or report.
(x) "Lawyer-guardian ad litem" means an attorney appointed
under section 10 who has the powers and duties referenced by
section 10.
(y) "Local office file" means the system used to keep a record
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


of a written report, document, or photograph filed with and
maintained by a county or a regionally based office of the
department.
(z) "Member of the clergy" means a priest, minister, rabbi,
Christian science Science practitioner, spiritual leader, or other
religious practitioner, or similar functionary of a church, temple,
spiritual community, or recognized religious body, denomination, or
organization.
(aa) "Nonparent adult" means a person who is an individual 18
years of age or older and who, regardless of the person's
individual's domicile, meets all of the following criteria in
relation to a child:
(i) Has substantial and regular contact with the child.
(ii) Has a close personal relationship with the child's parent
or with a person responsible for the child's health or welfare.
(iii) Is not the child's parent or a person an individual
otherwise related to the child by blood or affinity to the third
degree.
(bb) "Online reporting system" means the electronic system
established by the department for individuals identified in section
3(1) to report suspected child abuse or child neglect.
(cc) "Person responsible for the child's health or welfare"
means a parent, legal guardian, individual 18 years of age or older
who resides for any length of time in the same home in which the
child resides, or, except when used in section 7(1)(e) or 8(8),
nonparent adult; or an owner, operator, volunteer, or employee of 1
or more of the following:
(i) A licensed or registered child care organization.
(ii) A licensed or unlicensed adult foster care family home or
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


adult foster care small group home as those terms are defined in
section 3 of the adult foster care facility licensing act, 1979 PA
218, MCL 400.703.
(iii) A court-operated facility as approved under section 14 of
the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.14.
(dd) "Relevant evidence" means evidence having a tendency to
make the existence of a fact that is at issue more probable than it
would be without the evidence.
(ee) "Serious mental harm" and "serious physical harm" mean
those terms as defined in section 136b of the Michigan penal code,
1931 PA 328, MCL 750.136b.
(ff) "Specified information" means information in a children's
protective services case record related specifically to the
department's actions in responding to a complaint of child abuse or
child neglect. Specified information does not include any of the
following:
(i) Except as provided in this subparagraph regarding a
perpetrator of child abuse or child neglect, personal
identification information for any individual identified in a child
protective services record. The exclusion of personal
identification information as specified information prescribed by
this subparagraph does not include personal identification
information identifying an individual alleged to have perpetrated
child abuse or child neglect, which allegation has been classified
as a central registry case.
(ii) Information in a police agency report or other law
enforcement agency report as provided in section 7(3).
(iii) Any other information that is specifically designated as
confidential under other law.
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad


(iv) Any information not related to the department's actions in
responding to a report of child abuse or child neglect.
(gg) "Structured decision-making tool" means the department
document labeled "DSS-4752 (P3) (3-95)" or a revision of that
document that better measures the risk of future harm to a child.
(hh) "Substantiated" "Substantiated case" means a confirmed
case.
(ii) "Unsubstantiated" "Unsubstantiated case" means a case
that is not confirmed.
Final Page
OOH S02344'25 (S-1) j75gad